Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 6
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES FOR THE ELDERLY
AND FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES

43-1-601. Transportation services for the elderly and for persons with disabilities.

The department of transportation and the executive director thereof are designated and authorized to take all steps and adopt all proceedings necessary to make and enter into such contracts or agreements as may be necessary for state application and administration of the "Federal Transit Act", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5310, specifically designed for state operations including grant programs for the purpose of assisting nonprofit corporations, associations, and public bodies in making available appropriate highway transportation services for the elderly and for persons with disabilities. In performing this work, the said department shall consult with concerned local authorities for a productive statewide coordinated effort and shall prepare a statewide survey showing the transportation needs of elderly and of persons with disabilities in priority order. The commission shall budget and allocate the amounts to be expended for such purposes in accordance with section 43-1-113.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part added, p. 1933, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1096, § 119, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1346, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1677, § 99, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 261, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1916, § 136, effective August 5.

43-1-602. Department to promulgate rules.

The department of transportation is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations in order to carry out the purposes of this part 6.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part added, p. 1934, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1096, § 120, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For promulgation of rules and regulations, see article 4 of title 24.

43-1-603. Participation of political subdivisions.

Municipalities, counties, and special districts organized for transportation purposes shall have the authority to enter into contracts with and make grants to those private nonprofit entities that have been designated as recipients of funds pursuant to the "Federal Transit Act", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5301 et seq. Such contracts or grants may be for either operating or capital assistance.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part added, p. 1934, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 2050, § 100, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1916, § 137, effective August 5.